Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.550

Department to make examples of forest practices applications and resulting approvals available to the public.

(1) By December 31, 2013, the department must make examples of complete, high quality forest practices applications and the resulting approvals readily available to the public on its internet site, as well as the internet site of the office of regulatory assistance established in RCW 43.42.010. The department must maximize assistance to the public and interested parties by seeking to make readily available examples from forest practices that generate significant permitting activity or frequent questions.

(2) The department must regularly review and update the examples required to be made available on the internet under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The department must obtain the written permission of an applicant before making publicly available that applicant's application or approval under this section and must work cooperatively with the applicant to ensure that no personal or proprietary information is made available.

[ 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 208.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Limitation—Jurisdiction/authority of Indian tribe under act—2012 1st sp.s. c 1: See notes following RCW 77.55.011.

Authority of department of fish and wildlife under act—2012 1st sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 76.09.040.